Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.020

Objections to appointment.

Any person interested in a will may file objections in writing to the granting of letters testamentary to the persons named as executors, or any of them, and the objection shall be heard and determined by the court.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 47; RRS s 1417; prior: Code 1881 s 1372; 1863 p 217 s 106; 1860 p 179 s 73.]